Indiana, session 2026, HB1110.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 13-11-2-54.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 54.5. "Direct dischargers", for
purposes of IC 13-18-28, means a NPDES permit:
(1) applicant; or
(2) holder;
seeking to discharge industrial wastewater containing PFAS
chemicals directly into waters of the state.
SECTION 2. IC 13-11-2-68.8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 68.8. "Effluent limitation
standard", for purposes of IC 13-18-28, means the maximum
amount of PFAS chemicals a direct discharger or indirect
discharger is allowed to discharge in its wastewater under the
federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. 1342).
SECTION 3. IC 13-11-2-107.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
2026 IN 1110—LS 6535/DI 150


[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 107.5. "Indirect discharger", for
purposes of IC 13-18-28, means an entity that:
(1) intentionally; or
(2) unintentionally;
introduces industrial wastewater containing PFAS chemicals into
a publicly owned treatment works.
SECTION 4. IC 13-11-2-128.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 128.1. "Maximum contaminant
level", for purposes of IC 13-18-28, means the maximum
permissible level of PFAS chemical contamination in drinking
water delivered to a user of a public water system.
SECTION 5. IC 13-11-2-136.7 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 136.7. "National Pollutant
Discharge Elimination System permit" or "NPDES permit", for
purposes of IC 13-18-28, refers to a permit issued under the federal
Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. 1342).
SECTION 6. IC 13-11-2-163.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 163.4. "PFAS chemicals", for
purposes of IC 13-18-28, means any of the following perfluoroalkyl
and polyfluoroalkyl substances that contains at least one (1) fully
fluorinated carbon atom:
(1) Perfluorooctanoic acid (PFOA).
(2) Perfluorooctane sulfonic acid (PFOS).
(3) Perfluorohexane sulfonic acid (PFHxS).
(4) Perfluorononanoic acid (PFNA).
(5) Perfluorobutanesulfonic acid (PFBS).
(6) Hexafluoropropylene oxide dimer acid (HFPO-DA).
SECTION 7. IC 13-11-2-177.5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 177.5. "Publicly owned
treatment works", for purposes of IC 13-18-3 and IC 13-18-28, has the
meaning set forth in 327 IAC 5-1.5-48.
SECTION 8. IC 13-11-2-264.9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 264.9. (a) "Waters of the state",
for purposes of IC 13-18-28, means:
(1) the accumulations of water, surface and underground,
natural and artificial, and public and private; or
(2) a part of the accumulations of water;
that are wholly or partially within, flow through, or border upon
2026 IN 1110—LS 6535/DI 150


Indiana.
(b) The term includes all waters of the United States, as defined
in Section 502(7) of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C.
1362(7)), that are located in Indiana.
SECTION 9. IC 13-18-28 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 28. Regulation of PFAS Chemicals
Sec. 1. (a) Not later than July 1, 2027, the department shall
establish the following:
(1) Water quality standards for drinking water containing
PFAS chemicals informed by the maximum contaminant
levels established under the 2024 federal Safe Drinking Water
Act.
(2) Effluent limitation standards for wastewater containing
PFAS chemicals produced by direct dischargers located in
Indiana.
(b) Subject to subsection (c), the department shall:
(1) update the:
(A) maximum contaminant levels for identified PFAS
chemicals in Indiana drinking water; and
(B) effluent limitation standards for wastewater containing
PFAS chemicals produced by direct dischargers located in
Indiana;
every four (4) years; and
(2) establish maximum contaminant levels and effluent
limitation standards for new PFAS chemicals identified by the
department.
(c) Except in the case of establishing a maximum contaminant
level for a new PFAS chemical, the department may not increase
the maximum contaminant levels for PFAS chemicals beyond the
maximum contaminant levels for PFAS chemicals established by
the 2024 federal Safe Drinking Water Act.
Sec. 2. Beginning July 1, 2029, the department shall incorporate
the effluent limitation standards for wastewater established under
section 1 of this chapter into the NPDES permits issued to direct
dischargers.
Sec. 3. Beginning July 1, 2029, the department shall require
publicly owned treatment works (POTW) to:
(1) regulate the discharge of PFAS chemicals into the waters
of the state by indirect dischargers; and
(2) establish control mechanisms to reduce the discharge of
2026 IN 1110—LS 6535/DI 150


PFAS chemicals into the waters of the state.
Sec. 4. (a) The department shall require all direct dischargers to
conduct mandatory monitoring of industrial wastewater for PFAS
chemicals as part of the direct discharger's NPDES permit
obligations.
(b) A direct discharger shall submit a monthly report describing
the levels of PFAS chemicals detected in industrial wastewater to
the:
(1) department; and
(2) United States Environmental Protection Agency.
Sec. 5. (a) The department shall require indirect dischargers to
implement mandatory monitoring procedures for industrial
wastewater containing PFAS chemicals.
(b) An indirect discharger shall implement monitoring methods,
approved by the department, to track the levels of PFAS chemicals
discharged in industrial wastewater.
(c) An indirect discharger shall submit a monthly report
describing the levels of PFAS chemicals detected in industrial
wastewater to the:
(1) department; and
(2) United States Environmental Protection Agency.
Sec. 6. (a) A direct discharger or indirect discharger shall
achieve compliance with the effluent limitation standards
established by the department not later than July 1, 2029.
(b) The department shall notify a direct discharger or indirect
discharger when the direct discharger or indirect discharger is
violating this section.
Sec. 7. (a) A direct discharger or indirect discharger that
exceeds the effluent limitation standards after July 1, 2029, shall
develop and implement:
(1) a corrective action plan to remediate the existing levels of
PFAS chemicals in industrial wastewater; and
(2) a pollutant minimization program to prevent the future
discharge of PFAS chemicals.
(b) A direct discharger or indirect discharger shall share its
corrective action plan or pollutant minimization program with the
department within thirty (30) days of determining that the direct
discharger or indirect discharger is violating the effluent limitation
standards.
(c) A direct discharger or indirect discharger has four (4)
months to meet the effluent limitation standards.
(d) The department shall publish the monthly monitoring results
2026 IN 1110—LS 6535/DI 150


of:
(1) a direct discharger; or
(2) an indirect discharger;
that violates section 6 of this chapter and fails to implement a
corrective action plan or pollutant minimization program.
(e) The department shall include in the report the following
information:
(1) The name of the direct discharger or indirect discharger.
(2) The amount of PFAS chemicals discharged by the direct
discharger or indirect discharger.
(3) The name of every PFAS chemical discharged by the
direct discharger or indirect discharger.
(4) Any additional information determined by the
department.
Sec. 8. (a) A direct discharger or indirect discharger that
violates the effluent limitation standards after July 1, 2029, is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000) per day of any violation.
(b) The department may seek injunctive relief under this
chapter.
(c) If a direct discharger or indirect discharger continuously
violates the effluent limitation standards for four (4) months, the
department shall assess a civil penalty of not more than five
hundred thousand dollars ($500,000).
(d) The department shall deposit civil penalties collected under
this chapter in the PFAS chemical testing and remediation fund
established by section 9 of this chapter.
Sec. 9. (a) The PFAS chemical testing and remediation fund is
established.
(b) Subject to subsections (c) and (d), funds from the PFAS
chemical testing and remediation fund may be used to:
(1) offset the costs incurred by entities establishing filtration
and purification methods to reduce PFAS chemical levels;
(2) provide funds for a tenant or landlord to test wells and
biosoils for PFAS chemicals; and
(3) provide funds to remediate extreme PFAS chemical
exposure events and carry out blood testing for affected
community members.
(c) The department shall prioritize funding projects described
in subsection (b)(1) and (b)(2). Only funds remaining after an
application cycle for projects described in subsection (b)(1) and
(b)(2) may then be used to fund projects described in subsection
2026 IN 1110—LS 6535/DI 150


(b)(3).
(d) The department shall only provide funds to a tenant or
landlord to test wells and biosoils for PFAS chemicals:
(1) one (1) time per year; or
(2) within three (3) months of a remediation effort for an
extreme PFAS chemical exposure event.
(e) The fund shall be administered by the department.
(f) The expenses of administering the fund shall be paid from
the money in the fund.
(g) The treasurer of state shall invest money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public money may be invested. Interest that
accrues from these investments shall be deposited in the fund.
(h) Money in the fund consists of appropriations, gifts, grants,
donations from public or private sources, and civil penalties
collected under section 8 of this chapter.
(i) Money in the fund at the end of the state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
Sec. 10. (a) Not later than July 1, 2029, the department shall
create a grant program to award:
(1) water utilities (as defined in IC 8-1-30.8-4) and volunteer
fire departments establishing filtration and purification
methods to reduce PFAS chemical levels; and
(2) individuals testing wells and biosoils for PFAS chemicals.
(b) The department shall publish application requirements for
the grant program on the department's website.
Sec. 11. (a) A person may file a private action against a:
(1) direct discharger; or
(2) indirect discharger;
that violates this chapter.
(b) The person filing a private action for a violation under this
chapter shall comply with IC 13-30-3.
Sec. 12. The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
2026 IN 1110—LS 6535/DI 150